Hawaii statutes.
§97-3 Contributions and expenditures;
statement. (a) The following persons shall file a statement of
expenditures with the state ethics commission on March 31, May 31,
and January 31 of each year and within thirty days after adjournment sine
die of any special session of the legislature:

(1) Each lobbyist;

(2) Each person who spends $750 or more of the
person's or any other person's money in any six-month period for the purpose of
attempting to influence legislative or administrative action or a ballot issue
by communicating or urging others to communicate with public officials;
provided that any amounts expended for travel costs, including incidental meals
and lodging, shall not be included in the tallying of the $750; and

(3) Each person who employs or contracts for the
services of one or more lobbyists, whether independently or jointly with other
persons. If the person is an industry, trade, or professional association,
only the association is the employer of the lobbyist.

(b) The March 31 report shall cover the
period from January 1 through the last day of February. The May 31 report
shall cover the period from March 1 through April 30. The
January 31 report shall cover the period from May 1 through December 31
of the previous year. The report to be filed within thirty days after
adjournment sine die of a special session of the legislature shall cover the
period from May 1 through adjournment sine die of that special session and
shall apply to and include only those expenditures and contributions that
relate to legislative action considered during that special session.

(c) The statement shall contain the following
information:

(1) The name and address of each person with respect
to whom expenditures for the purpose of lobbying in the total sum of $25 or
more per day was made by the person filing the statement during the statement
period and the amount or value of such expenditure;

(2) The name and address of each person with respect
to whom expenditures for the purpose of lobbying in the aggregate of $150 or
more was made by the person filing the statement during the statement period
and the amount or value of such expenditures;

(3) The total sum or value of all expenditures for
the purpose of lobbying made by the person filing the statement during the
statement period in excess of $750 during the statement period; provided that
the sum or value of each expenditure is itemized in the following categories,
as applicable:

(A) Preparation and distribution of lobbying
materials;

(B) Media advertising;

(C) Compensation paid to lobbyists;

(D) Fees paid to consultants or services;

(E) Entertainment and events;

(F) Receptions, meals, food, and beverages;

(G) Gifts;

(H) Loans; and

(I) Other disbursements;

(4) The name and address of each person making
contributions to the person filing the statement for the purpose of lobbying in
the total sum of $25 or more during the statement period and the amount or
value of such contributions; and

(5) The subject area of the legislative and administrative
action which was supported or opposed by the person filing the statement during
the statement period.

(d) The receipt or expenditure of any money
for the purpose of influencing the election or defeat of any candidate for an
elective office or for the passage or defeat of any proposed measure at any
special or general election is excluded from the reporting requirement of this
section. [L 1975, c 160, pt of §1; am L 1979, c 91, §11; am L 1980, c 129,
§1(d); am L 1982, c 105, §4; gen ch 1985; am L 1991, c 238, §1; am L 1995, c
220, §6; am L 2014, c 144, §1 and c 224, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next